csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_IND_TI.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: niwaabandanziinaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: giwaabandanziinaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0SgO: niwaabandanziiminaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0SgO: giwaabandanziiminaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: giwaabandanziinaawaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: owaabandanziinaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: owaabandanziinaawaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: owaabandanziininaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: niwaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: giwaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0PlO: niwaabandanziiminaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0PlO: giwaabandanziiminaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: giwaabandanziinaawaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: owaabandanziinaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: owaabandanziinaawaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: owaabandanziininaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: niwaabandaanaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: giwaabandaanaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0SgO: niwaabandaaminaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0SgO: giwaabandaaminaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: giwaabandaanaawaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: owaabandaanaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: owaabandaanaawaadog
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: [owaabandaminaadog,owaabandaaninaadog]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: niwaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: giwaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0PlO: niwaabandaaminaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0PlO: giwaabandaaminaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: giwaabandaanaawaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: owaabandaanaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: owaabandaanaawaadogenan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: [owaabandaminaadogenan,owaabandaaninaadogenan]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziigoban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziigwaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandanziinigoban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamogoban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: waabandamogwaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: waabandaminigoban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: niwaabandanziin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: giwaabandanziin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO: niwaabandanziimin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO: giwaabandanziimin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: giwaabandanziinaawaa
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: owaabandanziin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: owaabandanziinaawaa
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO: [owaabandanziinini,owaabandanziini]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: niwaabandanziinan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: giwaabandanziinan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0PlO: niwaabandanziimin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0PlO: giwaabandanziimin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: giwaabandanziinaawaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: owaabandanziinan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: owaabandanziinaawaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0PlO: [owaabandanziinini,owaabandanziini]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: niwaabandaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: giwaabandaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO: niwaabandaamin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO: giwaabandaamin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: giwaabandaanaawaa
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: owaabandaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: owaabandaanaawaa
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO: [owaabandamini,owaabandaanini]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: niwaabandaanan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: giwaabandaanan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0PlO: niwaabandaamin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0PlO: giwaabandaamin
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: giwaabandaanaawaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: owaabandaanan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: owaabandaanaawaan
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0PlO: [owaabandamini,owaabandaanini]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: niwaabandanziinaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: giwaabandanziinaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO: niwaabandanziiminaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO: giwaabandanziiminaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: giwaabandanziinaawaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: owaabandanziinaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: owaabandanziinaawaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: owaabandanziininaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [niwaabandanziinaabaniin,niwaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [giwaabandanziinaabaniin,giwaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [niwaabandanziiminaabaniin,niwaabandanziiminaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [giwaabandanziiminaabaniin,giwaabandanziiminaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [giwaabandanziinaawaabaniin,giwaabandanziinaawaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [owaabandanziinaabaniin,owaabandanziinaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [owaabandanziinaawaabaniin,owaabandanziinaawaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [owaabandanziininaabaniin,owaabandanziininaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: niwaabandaanaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: giwaabandaanaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0SgO: niwaabandaaminaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0SgO: giwaabandaaminaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: giwaabandaanaawaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: owaabandaanaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: owaabandaanaawaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: owaabandaaninaaban
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [niwaabandaanaabaniin,niwaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [giwaabandaanaabaniin,giwaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [niwaabandaaminaabaniin,niwaabandaaminaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [giwaabandaaminaabaniin,giwaabandaaminaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [giwaabandaanaawaabaniin,giwaabandaanaawaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [owaabandaanaabaniin,owaabandaanaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [owaabandaanaawaabaniin,owaabandaanaawaabanen]
     waabandam+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [owaabandaaninaabaniin,owaabandaaninaabanen]
